Vermont statutes. Title 28 Public Institutions and Corrections
Subchapter 2. Conditions of Probation; Modifications; Discharge

Law Reviews —

For note, “Home Confinement as a Condition of Probation: A Proposal for Vermont,” see 12 Vt. L. Rev. 123 (1987).

§ 251.
DURATION OF PROBATION

The court placing a person on probation may terminate the period of probation and discharge the person at any time if such termination is warranted by the conduct of the offender and the ends of justice.

Upon the Commissioner’s motion to discharge pursuant to subsection 252(d) of this title, the sentencing court shall terminate the period of probation and discharge the person at the midpoint of the probation term unless the prosecutor seeks a continuation of probation within 21 days following receipt of notice of the Commissioner’s motion, and:
(b) (1) Upon the Commissioner’s motion to discharge pursuant to subsection 252(d) of this title, the sentencing court shall terminate the period of probation and discharge the person at the midpoint of the probation term unless the prosecutor seeks a continuation of probation within 21 days following receipt of notice of the Commissioner’s motion, and:

the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that termination and discharge will present a risk of danger to the victim of the offense or to the community; or

the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the probationer is not substantially in compliance with the conditions of probation that are related to the probationer’s rehabilitation or to victim or community safety.

If the court grants the prosecutor’s motion to continue probation, it may continue probation for the full term or any portion thereof. The court shall also review the conditions of probation and remove any conditions that are no longer necessary for the remainder of the term.

Notwithstanding

1 V.S.A. § 214

, this subsection shall apply retroactively to any probationer serving a specified term of probation.

A probationer shall not be deemed ineligible for discharge or term reduction due to unpaid restitution, fees, or surcharges.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

2021, No. 24

, § 3;

2021, No. 94

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, effective April 21, 2022.

§ 252.
Conditions of probation and midpoint review.

Conditions, generally. The conditions of probation shall be such as the court in its discretion deems reasonably necessary to ensure that the offender will lead a law-abiding life or to assist the offender to do so. The court shall provide as an explicit condition of every sentence to probation that if the offender is convicted of another offense during the period for which the sentence remains subject to revocation, then the court may impose revocation of the offender’s probation.

Probation conditions. When imposing a sentence of probation, the court may, as a condition of probation, require that the offender:

Work faithfully at a suitable employment or faithfully pursue a course of study or of vocational training that will equip the offender for suitable employment.

Work faithfully for a prescribed number of hours at community service activity acceptable to the court, or if so ordered by the court, acceptable to a probation officer.

Undergo available medical or psychiatric treatment and remain at a specified institution if required for that purpose.

Attend or reside at a facility established for the instruction, recreation, or residence of persons on probation.

Support the offender’s dependents and meet other family responsibilities.

Make restitution or reparation to the victim of his or her conduct, or to the Victims’ Compensation Fund to the extent it has made payment to or on behalf of the victim in accordance with 13 V.S.A. chapter 167, for the damage or injury which was sustained. When restitution or reparation is a condition of the sentence, the court, in accordance with

13 V.S.A. § 7043

, shall fix the amount thereof, which shall not exceed an amount the defendant can or will be able to pay, and shall fix the manner of performance.

Pay a fine authorized in accordance with law.

Refrain from purchasing or possessing a firearm or ammunition therefor, destructive device, or other dangerous weapon unless granted written permission by the court or probation officer.

Report to a probation officer at reasonable times as directed by the court or the probation officer.

Permit the probation officer to visit the offender at reasonable times at his or her home or elsewhere.

Remain within the jurisdiction of the court, unless granted permission to leave by the court or the probation officer.

Answer all reasonable inquiries by the probation officer and promptly notify the probation officer of any change in address or employment.

Not in any way harass the victim or the family of the victim.

Not contact the victim, unless this condition is specifically waived by the victim.

Participate in the Restorative Justice Program conducted by a community reparative board, pursuant to chapter 12 of this title. The court may direct a reparative board to assist in determining restitution to the victim, as provided by subdivision (6) of this subsection.

Submit to periodic polygraph testing if the offender is being placed on probation for a sex offense that requires registration pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 167, subchapter 3.

If the probation officer has reasonable grounds to believe the offender has violated a probation condition, permit a probation officer or designee to monitor or examine the offender’s activities, communications, and use of any computer or other digital or electronic media, including cell phone, smartphone, digital camera, digital video camera, digital music player or recorder, digital video player or recorder, personal digital assistant, portable electronic storage device, gaming system, or any other contemporary device capable of the storage of digital electronic communication or data storage or access to the Internet or other computer or digital network.

Satisfy any other conditions reasonably related to his or her rehabilitation. Such conditions may include prohibiting the use of alcohol, prohibiting having contact with minors, prohibiting or limiting the use of a computer or other electronic devices, and permitting a probation officer access to all computers or other digital or electronic media, mail covers, subscription services, and credit card statements. The court shall not impose a condition prohibiting the offender from engaging in any legal behavior unless the condition is reasonably related to the offender’s rehabilitation or necessary to reduce risk to public safety.

Certificate. When an offender is placed on probation, he or she shall be given a certificate explicitly setting forth the conditions upon which he or she is being released.

Review and recommendation for discharge.

The Commissioner shall review the record of each probationer serving a specified term during the month prior to the midpoint of that probationer’s specified term and shall file a motion requesting the sentencing court to dismiss the probationer from probation if the offender:

has not been found by the court to have violated the conditions of probation in the six months prior to the review;

is not serving a sentence for committing a crime specified in 13 V.S.A. chapter 19, subchapters 6 and 7; 13 V.S.A. chapter 72, subchapter 1; or

13 V.S.A. § 2602

; and

has completed those rehabilitative or risk reduction services required as a condition of probation that have a duration that is set and knowable at the outset of probation.

If the probationer does not meet the criteria set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Commissioner shall file a motion requesting the sentencing court to discharge the probation term once the probationer meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

If a probationer meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection and is subject to a pending criminal charge or violation of probation complaint, the Commissioner may file a motion requesting the sentencing court to dismiss the probationer from probation pursuant to this subsection. The motion shall identify the pending criminal charge or probation violation. After any pending criminal charges and probation violations are resolved, and if the probationer still meets the criteria set forth in subdivisions (1) of this subsection, the Commissioner shall file the motion requesting the sentencing court to dismiss the probationer from probation.

The prosecutor shall make a reasonable effort to notify any victim of record of a motion filed to reduce a probationer’s term pursuant to this subsection. “Reasonable effort” means attempting to contact the victim by first-class mail at the victim’s last known address and by telephone at the victim’s last known phone number.

Notwithstanding

1 V.S.A. § 214

, and notwithstanding the requirement in subdivision (1) of this subsection that the Commissioner review the probationer’s record during the month prior to the midpoint of that probationer’s specified term, this subsection shall apply retroactively to any probationer serving a specified term of probation. If the probationer has already reached the midpoint of that probationer’s specified term on or before the effective date of this act, the Commissioner shall review the probationer’s record as soon as possible for purposes of filing a motion pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

1983, No. 229

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1993, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, June 3, 1994;

1995, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1996;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 66, eff. May 24, 2000;

2001, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2007, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2009, No. 1

, § 39;

2021, No. 24

, § 4;

2021, No. 94

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, effective April 21, 2022.

§ 252a.
Review of probation conditions.

When the court imposes a sentence upon a defendant who has been convicted of an offense enumerated in section 204a of this title that includes a period of incarceration of more than one year to serve to be followed by probation, the court may make the probation contingent on the offender fulfilling specific stated conditions, such as taking part in treatment while incarcerated, and may modify, following a hearing pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the conditions of probation if a violation has occurred. The court shall review the probation conditions imposed at the time of sentencing after the incarceration portion of the sentence has been served, and prior to the offender’s release to probation. Such review shall include information about the offender developed after the date of sentencing, including information about the offender’s incarceration period.

For an offender whose probation is contingent on fulfilling conditions pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Department of Corrections shall prepare a prerelease probation report to the court at least 30 days prior to the release based upon information available to the Department. The prerelease probation report shall include the offender’s degree of participation in treatment while incarcerated, whether conditions imposed under subsection (a) of this section were complied with, and other information relevant to the offender’s release to the probationary sentence. The Department of Corrections shall provide a copy of the prerelease probation report to the attorney for the offender and the prosecuting attorney at the same time it provides the report to the court.

If the Commissioner of Corrections believes the offender has violated a condition imposed under subsection (a) of this section, he or she may recommend a change to the original probation order. In this case, the court shall schedule a modification hearing prior to the release date. The court may modify the conditions or add further requirements as authorized by section 252 of this title. The offender shall have a reasonable opportunity to contest the modification prior to its imposition. The prosecuting attorney shall represent the State in connection with any proceeding held in accordance with this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 1

, § 38.

§ 253.
Modification of conditions; revocations.

During the period of probation, the court, on application of a probation officer or of the offender, or on its own motion, may modify the requirements imposed upon the offender or add further requirements authorized by section 252 of this title.

Whenever the court proposes any modification of the conditions of probation, the probationer shall have a reasonable opportunity to contest the modification prior to its imposition.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2003, No. 57

, § 8, eff. July 1, 2004.

Particular conditions.

Where a probation condition proscribed defendant’s interaction with all children under the age of sixteen, but made no mention of specific public locations or events where children are often present, by prohibiting defendant from attending a fair, his probation officer converted the probation condition from a contact-based condition to a location-based condition, and in so doing, the officer crossed the line between condition interpretation and modification. State v. Rivers, 2005 VT 65, 178 Vt. 180, 878 A.2d 1070, 2005 Vt. LEXIS 145 (2005).

§ 254.
Attendance at treatment facility.

The court may require a person as a condition of probation to participate as a resident or nonresident in programs at a treatment center for all or part of the period of probation, provided that the Commissioner certifies that adequate treatment facilities, personnel, and programs are available. If the Commissioner determines that the person’s residence in the center or participation in its programs, or both, should be terminated, because the person can derive no further significant benefits from such residence or participation, or both, or because his or her residence or participation adversely affects the rehabilitation of other residents or participants, he or she shall so notify the court, which shall thereupon, by order, make such other provision with respect to the person on probation as it deems appropriate.

A person residing in or participating in a program at a treatment center shall be required to abide by the rules and regulations of the center and may be required to pay such cost incident to residence as the Commissioner deems appropriate.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 255.
Discharge.

Upon the termination of the period of probation or the earlier discharge of the probationer in accordance with section 251 of this title, the probationer shall, unless the court has ordered otherwise or under

13 V.S.A. § 7043(l)

, be relieved of any obligations imposed by the order of the court and shall have satisfied the sentence for the crime.

[Repealed.]

A court hearing shall be held prior to discharging an offender from probation for a sex offense that requires registration pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 167, subchapter 3.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

2001, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2003, No. 57

, § 9, eff. July 1, 2004;

2009, No. 1

, § 41.

§ 256.
Graduated sanctions for technical violations.

At any time before the discharge of the probationer or the termination of the period of probation if, in the judgment of the Commissioner, the probationer has violated a condition or conditions of his or her probation, other than a condition that the probationer pay restitution to the Department or a violation which constitutes a new crime, the Commissioner may sanction the probationer in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. However, no probationer shall be incarcerated except pursuant to the provisions of subchapter 3 of this chapter.

The Department of Corrections shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 that establish graduated sanction guidelines for probation violations as an alternative to arrest or citation under section 301 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § D8.